Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.097

Agency and local government reports furnished to joint committee.

All agency and local government reports concerning program performance, including administrative review, quality control, and other internal audit or performance reports, as requested by the joint committee, shall be furnished by the agency or local government requested to provide such report.

[ 2010 c 26 s 5; 1996 c 288 s 18; 1973 1st ex.s. c 197 s 2. Formerly RCW 44.28.087.]